District of Columbia statutes.
29-104.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Designation of agent” means a statement designating a registered agent, that is delivered to the Mayor for filing under § 29-104.11 by a nonregistered foreign entity or domestic nonfiling entity.

(2)

“Registered agent filing” means:

(A)

The public organic record of a domestic filing entity;

(B)

A statement of qualification of a domestic limited liability partnership;

(C)

A foreign registration statement filed pursuant to § 29-105.03; or

(D)

An designation of a registered agent.

(3)

“Represented entity” means a:

(A)

Domestic filing entity;

(B)

Domestic or limited liability partnership;

(C)

Registered foreign entity;

(D)

Domestic or foreign unincorporated nonprofit association for which a designation of an agent is in effect;

(E)

Domestic nonfiling entity for which a designation of an agent has been filed; or

(F)

Nonregistered foreign entity for which a designation of an agent has been filed.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(a)(16), 59 DCR 13171

History

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 rewrote the section.

Effect of Amendments

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.

Editor's Notes